The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Tale of Snowball Lamb, by Arthur Bailey

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The Tale of Snowball Lamb

Author: Arthur Bailey

Illustrator: Harry L. Smith

Release Date: February 13, 2008 [EBook #24592]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TALE OF SNOWBALL LAMB ***




Produced by Joe Longo, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net












THE TALE OF SNOWBALL LAMB




SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

(Trademark Registered)

BY

ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

        AUTHOR OF
        SLEEPY-TIME TALES
        (Trademark Registered)

        TUCK-ME-IN TALES
        (Trademark Registered)


        THE TALE OF THE MULEY COW
        THE TALE OF OLD DOG SPOT
        THE TALE OF GRUNTY PIG
        THE TALE OF HENRIETTA HEN
        THE TALE OF TURKEY PROUDFOOT
        THE TALE OF PONY TWINKLEHEELS
        THE TALE OF MISS KITTY CAT

[Illustration: "You'd Better Git Out of the Way," Said Henrietta Hen.

_The Tale of Snowball Lamb._

_Frontispiece_--(_Page 16_)]




        SLUMBER-TOWN TALES
        (Trademark Registered)

        THE TALE OF
        SNOWBALL LAMB

        BY
        ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY
        Author of
        "SLEEPY-TIME TALES"
        (Trademark Registered)

        and

        "TUCK-ME-IN TALES"
        (Trademark Registered)

        ILLUSTRATED BY
        HARRY L. SMITH

        NEW YORK
        GROSSET & DUNLAP
        PUBLISHERS

        Made in the United States of America




        COPYRIGHT, 1922, BY
        GROSSET & DUNLAP




CONTENTS


  CHAPTER                       PAGE

      I  BLACK AND WHITE           7

     II  A RIDE TO TOWN           12

    III  MRS. HEN TELLS TALES     17

     IV  SCHOOL BEGINS            22

      V  THE PROMISED TREAT       29

     VI  MR. CROW EXPLAINS        33

    VII  WARNING THE FLOCK        38

   VIII  SALTING THE SHEEP        43

     IX  CIRCUS TRICKS            50

      X  THE TIGER                55

     XI  CRACKED CORN             60

    XII  THE ACCIDENT             64

   XIII  FOLLOW MY LEADER         69

    XIV  TEASING UNCLE JERRY      74

     XV  UNCLE JERRY OBJECTS      79

    XVI  AUNT NANCY'S PLAN        84

   XVII  A TERRIBLE MIX-UP        88

  XVIII  THE SWING                92

    XIX  THE WRONG TARGET         97

     XX  THE SWIMMING HOLE       102

    XXI  A DUCKING               107

   XXII  A GREAT JOKE            112

  XXIII  A MYSTERY               117

   XXIV  HALF AND HALF           122




THE TALE OF SNOWBALL LAMB




I

BLACK AND WHITE


"Hurrah!" Johnnie Green shouted. And he dashed out of the woodshed and
ran to the barnyard as fast as he could scamper.

There was a good reason for his high spirits and his haste. His father
had just told him he might have a lamb for a pet.

Farmer Green followed Johnnie at a slower pace. When he reached the
barnyard fence Johnnie was already on the other side of it, trying to
catch a certain black lamb.

Now, Johnnie Green was spry; but this black lamb was sprier. Whenever
Johnnie thought he had the lamb the black rascal always managed to slip
out of his clutches.

"I'll help you," said Farmer Green. And climbing the fence, he soon had
the lively lamb cornered and caught.

Then Johnnie lost no time in taking his new pet in his own arms.

"I'm going to call him----" Johnnie began, as his father let go of the
struggling black armful.

But Johnnie Green never finished what he had started to say. The first
thing he knew the lamb had squirmed out of his arms and was running up
the lane.

Johnnie straightened up and gazed after him in dismay.

"I don't believe I'll call him anything," he murmured, half to himself.

Farmer Green couldn't help laughing. And then, noticing a very
disappointed look on Johnnie's face, he said, "Cheer up, Johnnie! That
lamb is the youngest one on the farm, but he's too big for a pet. He's a
wild one. Let him run with the flock and we'll see if we can't do
something to make you feel happy."

Well, Johnnie Green knew that when his father talked like that it was
silly to be glum. So he cried, "All right!" And turning his back upon
the black lamb, which was by this time almost up to the head of the
lane, Johnnie walked back to the woodshed.

The next day, when Farmer Green came home from a drive over the hill,
Johnnie shouted "Hurrah!" once more. For lying on a bit of hay in the
bottom of the buggy was a white lamb no more than half as big as the
lively black scamp that had got away from Johnnie the day before.

Johnnie Green didn't need to ask whose lamb this was. He knew at once
that it was his own.

"Where'd you get him?" he demanded.

"At your uncle's!" his father explained.

Johnnie lifted the white lamb out of the buggy and set him down gingerly
upon the ground. And the white lamb didn't try to run off. He was only a
tiny thing, with a very soft coat and a very pink nose.

"I wonder if he's hungry," said Johnnie Green. "I'll get some corn and
see if he wants anything."

"You'll have to feed him milk in a bottle," his father told him. "He
isn't weaned yet. Bring him into the woodshed!"

In a little while Johnnie's father had found a baby's bottle, which he
filled with warm milk.

Then all Johnnie had to do was to hold the bottle to his new pet's
mouth. The lamb did the rest.

"I'm going to call him 'Snowball,'" Johnnie announced. And then he began
to laugh.

"Look at his tail!" he shouted. "He'll switch it off if he isn't
careful."

For as Snowball drank the milk he jerked his stubby tail up and down at
a great rate.

Old dog Spot, who was stretched upon the woodshed threshold, gazed at
Snowball with a lofty air.

"That lamb has a queer notion of the way a tail ought to be wagged," he
said deep down in his throat. "He ought to wag it from side to side. But
I suppose he's too young to know better."




II

A RIDE TO TOWN


Much to old dog Spot's disgust Johnnie Green and his new pet lamb soon
became great friends. It wasn't long before Snowball, as Johnnie called
the white lamb, followed his young master about the yard and even into
the farmhouse--when Mrs. Green wasn't looking.

It was a remark that Johnnie made about Snowball one day which caused
old Spot to speak his mind plainly to the Muley Cow. Johnnie Green
actually said, in Spot's hearing, "Snowball knows as much as a dog!"

"I never did have any use for sheep," Spot told the Muley Cow.
"Everybody knows they're all terribly stupid. So you can imagine how I
felt when Johnnie Green spoke like that to his father."

The Muley Cow chewed her cud. She had a far-off look in her eyes, as if
she might be thinking about what Spot was saying--or as if she might
not. Anyhow, she did not speak.

"And to think--" Spot growled--"to think how I used to take care of
Johnnie when he was no more than a baby! Do you suppose this lamb could
take care of a baby? Do you suppose he'd pull a baby out of the mill
pond? Or fight off a bull? Or kill a snake?"

The Muley Cow turned her calm face upon Spot.

"If you're jealous----" she began.

"Jealous!" Spot barked. "Of course I'm not jealous. But I must say that
this Snowball Lamb is very displeasing to me."

"Then why don't you----" the Muley Cow began again.

"I would," Spot interrupted, "I would--only I'm not a sheep-killer. And
I don't intend to become one."

"This boy," said the Muley Cow, "he'll grow tired of that lamb. The
other boys will begin to tease him because the lamb follows him about.
And that will be too much for Johnnie. . . . I know boys," the Muley
Cow declared.

Old dog Spot sighed. "I hope you're not mistaken," he remarked. "Time
will tell. Just now anybody can see that Johnnie Green is simply crazy
about that silly new pet of his."

It was only a few days later that something happened to cause old dog
Spot to lose all hope.

Johnnie Green and his father hitched up the old horse Ebenezer and
started for the village. Of course Spot would have followed them, under
the wagon, if he had been at the barn when they left. But he wasn't. He
was up in the pasture, chasing woodchucks.

Just as old Ebenezer turned the corner at the foot of the hill Johnnie
Green happened to look back. And there was Snowball, following a little
way behind them!

Of course it would never do to let him run all the way to the village
and back. And Farmer Green didn't want to turn around and take Snowball
home. So Johnnie Green jumped down and lifted Snowball into the wagon.

So he rode to the village; and then rode home again.

Johnnie Green was greatly pleased by the whole affair. And Snowball was
pleased, too. As soon as he reached the farmyard he began talking about
his trip to the village.

Everybody listened to Snowball with wonder. That is, everybody wondered
except Henrietta Hen. She began talking in a shrill voice about her
visit to the county fair. And she said spitefully to Snowball, "You'd
better get out of the way before old dog Spot comes back from the
pasture!"




III

MRS. HEN TELLS TALES


Old dog Spot came home from the pasture feeling quite pleased with
himself. He had caught a fat woodchuck. And that was enough to make him
happy.

Spot hadn't crossed the barnyard when Henrietta Hen came fluttering up
to him. She was a busybody, always trying to get somebody into trouble.
"Snowball went to the village with Johnnie Green and his father!"
Henrietta shrieked.

"That's good news," said old dog Spot. "I've been hoping to hear
something like that. We're well rid of that Snowball Lamb."

"Oh! But they brought him back with them!" Henrietta Hen explained.

Spot's face fell. "That's a pity," he said.

Henrietta Hen peered into Spot's face. There was something that she
couldn't understand.

"Why aren't you angry?" she inquired in her high-pitched voice. "Don't
you realize that Snowball tried to _follow the wagon_ to the village? To
be sure, they picked him up down at the corner. But I want you to know
that he tried to _take your place_."

At that old Spot let out a howl of rage.

"I'll never go woodchuck hunting again!" he cried. "Things have come to
a pretty pass if I can't leave the farmyard for a few hours without
having a lamb insult me like that."

Henrietta Hen was pleased.

"I thought you'd want to know what had happened," she remarked. "And now
I must add that Snowball has been boasting about his trip. Of course,
his journey was nothing, compared with my visit to the county fair last
year. But I don't like to hear a lamb telling about his travels. Can't
you put a stop to it?"

Old dog Spot shook his head.

"For once," he said slowly, "I can't help wishing I was a sheep-killer."

"Well," said Henrietta, "you know you could try."

"It's not a question of trying," Spot told her. "My family isn't a
sheep-killing one. I have to live up to the family name."

"Well," Henrietta Hen declared, "if I were you I'd join another
family--at least for a short time."

But old dog Spot declared that that wouldn't do at all. "We'll have to
be patient," he said. "The Muley Cow claims that Johnnie Green will get
tired of Snowball sooner or later. It may be that she is right. Let us
hope so!"

"Farmer Green ought to turn that great lamb into the pasture," Henrietta
Hen spluttered.

That was exactly what Mrs. Green herself thought.

"Your lamb can't come into my kitchen!" she called at that very moment.
For Johnnie Green was just then entering the doorway, with Snowball at
his heels.

"Thank goodness," Spot barked, "there's one person on this farm who has
some sense! If it wasn't for Mrs. Green I'd be tempted to run away."

As Johnnie Green closed the door behind him, leaving Snowball upon the
stone step, Snowball gave a plaintive _baa-a-a!_

"Ugh!" cackled Henrietta Hen. "Did you ever hear such a silly sound in
all your life?"




IV

SCHOOL BEGINS


After Snowball's trip to the village old dog Spot scarcely stirred from
the farmyard. He left the woodchucks to scurry about the pasture as they
pleased. For he felt that he ought to keep an eye on Snowball.

The very next time that Snowball started to follow Johnnie Green out of
the yard Spot ran up to him and barked at his heels. "Go back!" Spot
growled. "Don't you dare leave this yard!"

And then, to Spot's surprise, Johnnie Green picked up a stick and
threatened him with it.

"You let my lamb alone!" Johnnie cried. That was bad enough, according
to old dog Spot's notion. But when Johnnie shouted, "Get out!" at him,
that was worse.

Spot tucked his tail between his legs and slunk away, to hide himself
under the woodshed. And there he stayed for the rest of the morning and
sulked.

But in the afternoon he began to feel more cheerful. For Spot had heard
Mrs. Green remark that school began the next day.

That was good news. At least Spot so thought it.

"This lamb won't get much notice from Johnnie Green after to-day," Spot
told Henrietta Hen. "He'll be left here in the yard. And it won't be
long now before Mrs. Green tells Farmer Green to put him in the pasture
with the flock. She won't have him in everybody's way. She'll get rid
of him quickly. You know that when Mrs. Green makes up her mind, things
generally happen to suit her."

Henrietta nodded her handsome head.

"Just what I've often told the Rooster!" she exclaimed.

Well, the following morning, as much as an hour after breakfast, Johnnie
Green started up the road with some books under his arm and a lunch
basket in his hand. It was the first day of school. And somehow Johnnie
wasn't feeling very happy. He had dawdled about the house--so his mother
said. It appeared that he was in no hurry to leave home.

Before Johnnie had reached the barn, which stood beside the road, Mrs.
Green stepped out of the house and looked at him.

"You'd better get along!" she called after him. "You don't want to be
late the first day of school!"

So Johnnie Green fell into a jog trot, which he kept up all the way to
the red schoolhouse.

As he came in sight of the little box-like building he saw other
youngsters hurrying through the doorway. And then Johnnie ran as fast as
he could.

He burst inside the schoolroom just as the school mistress tapped the
little bell on her desk, which meant that everybody must stop talking,
because school had begun. Johnnie Green hurried to a seat. But before he
reached it all the other pupils burst into a shout.

Johnnie looked around. And there, trotting across the floor, was
Snowball! He had followed Johnnie all the way from Farmer Green's barn.

It was some time before things were quiet. The teacher had to ring her
little bell a good many times, and even rap upon her desk with a ruler,
before the boys and girls stopped laughing. And then the teacher turned
to Johnnie Green and spoke to him.

"Mary!" she said. "Is this your little lamb?"

The teacher seemed surprised because her pupils began to roar at that.
But she made no attempt to silence them. She did not even try to quiet a
certain boy called "Red," who made more noise than all the rest
together.

Meanwhile Johnnie Green's face looked like a great red apple. And it
grew several shades redder when Snowball walked up to his seat and stood
close beside him.

"Don't you think--" said the teacher after a while--"don't you think,
Mary, that you'd better take your little lamb home?"

Johnnie Green did not answer. But he hung his head as he rose and
hurried out of the schoolroom, with Snowball following close behind him.

Once outside Johnnie could hear the children still laughing. And he even
thought that he could hear the teacher laughing, too.

That very morning Snowball found himself turned into the pasture where
Farmer Green's flock of sheep were passing the summer. And it wasn't
long before the whole barnyard was filled with the noise of gossiping
tongues.

"For once," said Henrietta Hen, "the Muley Cow knew what she was talking
about when she said Johnnie Green would grow tired of that white lamb."

As for old dog Spot, he told everybody that he was going up to the
pasture to chase woodchucks.

And as for Johnnie Green, he told his mother that he didn't believe he'd
go back to school any more.

But she said he should, and that very morning.

And things generally happened the way Mrs. Green intended.




V

THE PROMISED TREAT


Snowball wasn't sorry that Johnnie Green had turned him into the
pasture. He found the pasture a delightful place. He had plenty of
company, for there was a whole flock of sheep with him. And not only did
he soon become acquainted with them. He met other folk, such as Billy
Woodchuck and Jimmy Rabbit and old Mr. Crow. And though some of the
older sheep paid scant heed to so young a lamb as Snowball, Mr. Crow
often went out of his way to stop and talk with him.

That was because Mr. Crow loved a bit of gossip. And he was willing to
chat with anybody on the chance of picking up some interesting morsel
of news.

"We're going to have a treat," Snowball informed old Mr. Crow one day.

The old gentleman cocked his head on one side and looked at Snowball.

"How do you know you are?" he demanded. He was a great one for asking
questions.

"The Muley Cow told me," Snowball explained. "Down in the barn she heard
Farmer Green tell Johnnie about it."

"Ah, ha!" cried Mr. Crow. "I'll have to keep an eye on things. If
there's going to be a treat I must get my share of it. . . . Where's
it going to be--where do you expect to have this treat?"

"Right here in this pasture!"

"That's good!" Mr. Crow exclaimed. "I'm glad of that. I can enjoy it,
then. I feared it might be in the barn. And I like plenty of room if
I'm to enjoy a treat properly."

Snowball began to feel a bit uneasy.

"The Muley Cow didn't say anything about your being invited," he
blurted. "In fact she said that this treat was for us sheep only."

"Don't you worry about that!" the old gentleman assured him. "I know
well enough that if Farmer Green didn't mention inviting me it was
because he forgot it. I know he wouldn't like it if I stayed away."

Snowball began to wish he hadn't mentioned the treat to Mr. Crow. But
the secret was out. And when Mr. Crow asked when the treat was going to
be Snowball confessed that the Muley Cow had told him the flock would
enjoy it that very day.

"Ah!" said Mr. Crow with a smirk. "Then I must stay where I can see
what's going on. So I'm going to sit in that tall elm over by the stone
wall. When I see the sheep begin to bunch together I'll join you at
once. . . . Please bleat three times when the treat is ready, for I might
be dozing."

"I will," Snowball promised.

And then Mr. Crow got ready to fly away.

"By the way," he said, pausing, "what's the treat to be?"

"The Muley Cow said she heard Farmer Green tell Johnnie to 'salt the
sheep to-day,'" Snowball explained.

To his great surprise old Mr. Crow let out a deafening squawk when he
heard that bit of news.

"Then I'll keep as far away from the pasture as I can get!" he cried.




VI

MR. CROW EXPLAINS


Snowball couldn't understand old Mr. Crow's rage. Mr. Crow had invited
himself to the treat that Johnnie Green was going to give the flock. But
the moment the old gentleman heard that the treat was going to be _salt_
he had squalled at the top of his hoarse voice that he was going to stay
as far from the pasture as he could get.

"What's the matter?" Snowball asked Mr. Crow. "Don't you like salt?"

Mr. Crow made a wry face.

"No, I don't!" he spluttered.

"Well, just because you don't happen to care for salt is no reason for
your being so angry," Snowball told him.

And then Mr. Crow almost took his breath away.

"I agree with you," he said gruffly! And Mr. Crow was a person who was
never known to agree with anybody! So that was an astonishing remark for
him to make.

"Then I suppose you'll get over being angry, at once," Snowball
ventured.

"I won't!" Mr. Crow thundered. "And take a bit of advice, young fellow:
Don't go near the salting party! It will be dangerous," he added darkly.

"Why will it be dangerous?" Snowball inquired.

The old gentleman shook his head and put on a very wise look.

"I don't believe you've ever been at a salting party," he said.

And Snowball confessed that he hadn't.

Whereat Mr. Crow nodded his head up and down several times and looked
even wiser than before.

"It's lucky for you, my lad, that you told me about this affair," he
declared. "For I'm going to keep you out of a peck of trouble. Don't you
go near the party! Keep just as far away from it as you can! When you
see Johnnie Green come inside the pasture you scramble over the stone
wall and hide!" And now he shook his head.

"It's a pity--" he sighed--"a pity you can't fly, or climb a tree."

He was so gloomy that Snowball couldn't help feeling uncomfortable. And
all he could manage to say was one word which he had hard work to
stammer out. It was "W-w-why?"

"Because it's just a trick!" Mr. Crow explained. "It's a trick to catch
you. This trick of salting the sheep is as old as the hills. But I
suppose you're so young you never have happened to hear of it. I must
say," he added, "I'm surprised that the Muley Cow didn't take the
trouble to tell you all about it."

"Maybe she's too young to know about it, too," Snowball suggested.

"Young!" Mr. Crow cried with a short, mirthless laugh. "The Muley Cow's
not young. She's the oldest cow on the farm. If the truth must be told,
she's so old that Farmer Green wouldn't keep her if it weren't that
Johnnie Green thinks she belongs to him. And he'd raise a terrible row
if his father sold her."

"Are you too young to explain about this trick that you just warned me
against?" Snowball asked. "I'd like to know how there can be any danger
in salt. How can anybody be caught with salt?"

"Well, you _are_ a silly!" cried Mr. Crow. "Can't you guess that Johnnie
Green is going to put salt on everybody's tail?"




VII

WARNING THE FLOCK


Snowball Lamb was puzzled. He didn't understand old Mr. Crow's answer at
all.

"What if Johnnie Green should put salt on my tail?" he asked Mr. Crow.
"What harm would that do?"

The old gentleman stared at Snowball as if he couldn't quite believe
that anybody could be so stupid.

"Haven't you ever heard that that's the way to catch people?" cried Mr.
Crow at last. "Why, there isn't a boy in Pleasant Valley who doesn't
know that; and many of 'em carry salt about in their pockets all the
time, hoping to get a chance some day to put the salt on my tail, and
capture me!" Mr. Crow's bright eyes snapped. And his bill snapped, too.
For the mere thought of such scheming always made him terribly angry.

And then Snowball said something that made Mr. Crow more impatient than
ever.

"I don't care if Johnnie Green does catch me," Snowball declared.
"Johnnie wouldn't hurt me. We've always been great friends."

"He wouldn't, eh?" Mr. Crow retorted. "How do you know he wouldn't hurt
you?"

"He never _has_ hurt me," Snowball replied.

"Perhaps not! Perhaps not!" Mr. Crow croaked. "But you never can tell.
You never can tell what a boy will do. And if you go to the salting
party and get into trouble, don't say I didn't warn you!" As the old
fellow flew off he looked as if all the cares in the world were weighing
him down. Snowball noticed that he flew heavily. It took a great amount
of flapping of his broad wings to lift him out of the pasture. And when
he was well up in the air he gave a glum _caw, caw_ as he wheeled and
sailed away down the wind.

Well, Snowball couldn't help being somewhat disturbed by Mr. Crow's
grave actions and his graver remarks. "I wonder," thought Snowball, "if
Mr. Crow knows what he's talking about. I'll ask the flock!"

So Snowball ran down the hillside pasture to the place where the flock
had gathered to graze. And to his astonishment some of the flock didn't
even lift their heads from the grass when he related all that Mr. Crow
had said. Those that did pause and listen to Snowball only giggled and
went to feeding again. No! there was one that spoke to him. Aunt Nancy
Ewe spoke up a bit tartly.

"If you're worried you'd better stay away when Johnnie Green comes to
salt us," she told him. "_We_ all expect to have a very pleasant time,"
she added.

"Have you ever had salt put on your tail?" Snowball asked the old lady.

"Certainly not!" she snapped. And she glared at Snowball so fiercely
that he fell back several steps. "Are you trying to insult me?" she
cried.

He did not answer. It was plain to him that Aunt Nancy didn't know
anything about the trick of putting salt on one's tail. Yes! Mr. Crow
must be wiser than she was.

"They'll all get into trouble," Snowball thought. And then he said
something that was almost exactly like what Mr. Crow had said to him.
"They can't say I didn't warn them!"




VIII

SALTING THE SHEEP


Snowball Lamb stood in the pasture apart from the rest of the flock.
Aunt Nancy Ewe had returned to her grazing. And not one of her
companions acted as if some dreadful peril hung over him. Nobody would
have thought, to look at the flock, that they were about to have salt
put on their tails. But Snowball knew that it was so. Far down the
valley he could hear old Mr. Crow's warning _caw_, _caw_, telling him
again to beware of Johnnie Green.

And just then Johnnie squirmed through the pasture bars and pulled a
sack after him. Presently he began to call to the sheep. And Snowball
watched while they went, one and all, on a dead run towards the bars.

Then Snowball turned and ran the other way, straight for the stone wall.
He didn't even look back once, but scrambled over the wall and lost
himself in the tangle of berry bushes that grew in a rocky old pasture
that hadn't been used for years.

"He's salting them by this time," Snowball muttered to himself. "Johnnie
Green is salting the sheep. And I'm glad Mr. Crow warned me, for I
shouldn't want salt put on my tail. It must be terrible to be caught
that way."

"What's that you're saying?" said a lively voice near-by.

Snowball leaped back; then stood still and stared at a pair of antlers
which stuck up from behind a berry bush.

The antlers rose a little higher. And then Snowball saw the face of
Nimble Deer beneath them.

"What were you murmuring about _salt_?" Nimble inquired pleasantly.

"Johnnie Green is salting the sheep over in our pasture," Snowball
explained.

"He is, eh?" cried Nimble Deer. "Then why aren't you there with the
rest?"

Snowball shook his head.

"It's too dangerous," he said. "I don't want salt put on my tail."

Nimble Deer gave him a queer look.

"It is dangerous, while Johnnie Green is there--or it would be dangerous
if he had a gun," Nimble admitted. "But what's this you say about salt
on your tail?"

"Johnnie Green is putting salt on the tail of every sheep in the flock,"
Snowball declared.

"That's odd," said Nimble. "I'll have to look into this matter--after
Johnnie Green has left the pasture."

Snowball did not follow Nimble as he moved nearer the stone wall. But he
stood still and watched. Presently he saw Nimble leap the wall. After
that Snowball could no longer see him.

It was some time later when Nimble jumped back over the wall and landed
lightly on the ledge that ran alongside it. And Snowball noticed that
his face wore a very cheerful look.

"Well?" said Snowball.

"That was as good salt as I ever tasted," Nimble remarked, running his
tongue over his lips. "If you hurry you'll be able to get a taste even
now."

"I've never eaten any salt," said Snowball.

"Then hurry, by all means!" cried Nimble Deer. "You don't know what
you're missing."

"Has Johnnie gone?" Snowball inquired.

"Long ago!"

"I suppose he spilled some of the salt on the ground," said Snowball.
"You know he's a very careless boy."

"He spilled heaps of it," Nimble Deer replied. "But the sheep are eating
it fast."

Well, Snowball was puzzled. How could the sheep be eating salt if
Johnnie Green had caught them? It was more than he could understand. But
if Nimble Deer had been with them--and come back safely--there couldn't
be any great danger.

So Snowball hurried over the stone wall and scampered down to the place
near the bars, where the flock still lingered.

As Snowball joined them he saw that they were all busily eating
something white that lay in little piles upon the ground.

He tasted of the stuff, carefully. It was delicious. And wasting no more
time, he gobbled up all of the salt that he could get.

When it was gone Snowball turned to old Aunt Nancy Ewe.

"May I lick the salt off your tail?" he asked her politely.

She gave him a haughty stare.

"Have you no respect for your elders?" Aunt Nancy asked him severely.

"Pardon me!" said Snowball. "Maybe I'm mistaken, but Mr. Crow told
me----"

[Illustration: Aunt Nancy Scolded Snowball

_The Tale of Snowball Lamb._ _Page_ 48]

"Mr. Crow!" Aunt Nancy cried, before Snowball could finish. "So it's Mr.
Crow that's been putting queer ideas into your head! I might have known
it. After this don't ever listen to him! He's been the means of your
almost missing a fine treat--and one that doesn't come every day in the
year."




IX

CIRCUS TRICKS


Johnnie Green had been to the circus. And of course he wanted to try a
good many tricks that he had learned there. At first he made old dog
Spot perform for him. But when he attempted to get Spot to jump through
a hoop of fire the old dog refused flatly to play any more.

That was why Johnnie went to the pasture and brought Snowball Lamb back
to the farmyard.

"Now, Snowball," said Johnnie Green, "I've been to the circus and seen
ever so many kinds of trained animals--horses and elephants and dogs and
monkeys and seals. But I didn't see any trained lamb. If you pay
attention and learn what I try to teach you maybe you and I can join the
circus next year."

Snowball Lamb answered, "_Baa-a-a!_"

"All right!" cried Johnnie. "Now you just jump through this wooden
hoop!"

But it didn't prove to be as easy as all that. Johnnie Green had to work
a long, long time before he succeeded at last in teaching Snowball to
obey him. And then, after Snowball jumped through the hoop in as
graceful a manner as anybody could have asked for, Johnnie was not quite
satisfied.

"You'll have to learn to jump through a paper hoop if we're ever going
to be taken along with the circus," he told Snowball.

Again Snowball answered, "_Baa-a-a!_"

"All right!" said Johnnie. "I'll make some paper hoops. And to-morrow
we'll see what you can do."

So back to the pasture went Snowball. And into the woodshed went Johnnie
Green. There he stayed all the rest of the afternoon, knocking old
barrels apart, chopping and sawing and hammering. He laid newspapers
down upon the floor and trimmed them neatly with his mother's shears. He
made flour paste in the kitchen. And when milking time came he had four
fine hoops all covered with newspaper.

Johnnie wanted to make one more. But his father came along and happened
to pick up a barrel stave, remarking that it was just the thing to make
a boy jump to his work. So Johnnie decided, for some reason or other,
that four hoops would be enough to practice with. Of course when he and
Snowball joined the circus they would need dozens of hoops. But there
wasn't really any hurry about that.

So he went for a milk pail and trotted off to the barn, where he sat
down on his three-legged stool and began milking the Muley Cow.

He couldn't help thinking, as he sat there and sent streams of milk
tinkling down upon the bottom of the tin pail, what a fine scheme it
would be to build a hoop big enough for the Muley Cow to jump through.
It ought to be easy to teach her. For everybody knew that she was a
famous jumper. She made more trouble, jumping the fence, than all the
rest of Farmer Green's herd.

Johnnie Green got to thinking so intently about the matter that he began
to dawdle. And if there was one thing that the Muley Cow didn't like it
was to have to stand still while a slow milker puttered at his work. So
she suddenly gave her tail a switch and brought the end of it across
Johnnie Green's cheek.

It was a stinging smack. And Johnnie Green cried, "Ouch!"

After that he stopped his day-dreaming until milking was over. And then
he went back to the woodshed and gazed at the four paper hoops leaning
against the woodpile.




X

THE TIGER


In the same pasture with Snowball was a black lamb. He was the black
lamb that Farmer Green once gave to Johnnie for a pet. But he ran away
up the lane the very first time Johnnie tried to hold him in his arms.

After that the black lamb had always stayed with the flock. He was a
wild, unruly fellow, bigger and older than Snowball. And he was quite
outspoken--and not always careful of his language.

This black lamb chanced to be near Snowball when Johnnie Green came into
the pasture on a certain fine morning. And when Johnnie began calling
to Snowball the black lamb said, "Why don't you run the other way?
That's what I always do when boys call me."

Snowball made no answer. He stood and looked at Johnnie Green, who was
walking towards him with outstretched hand.

"Come on!" cried the black lamb. "I'll run with you."

"No!" said Snowball. "Johnnie may have something good for me to eat.
Some salt, maybe!"

"Huh!" said the black lamb. "Don't be stupid! What if he has brought you
a little salt? He'll want you to jump through that hoop again for him,
the way he did yesterday." Snowball had told the black lamb about the
strange proceeding of the afternoon before.

"Well--" Snowball murmured, as he hesitated, not knowing whether to
obey the black lamb or Johnnie Green.

"Well! Are you coming with me?" the black lamb demanded. "_I'm_ not
going to stay here where that boy can grab me. _I_ don't intend to spend
my time jumping through any old hoop. _I'm_ not quite so silly as to do
that."

"I believe I'll let Johnnie catch me," Snowball told him. "Johnnie said
something yesterday about our joining the circus. No doubt you've
noticed the circus posters on the side of the barn?"

"I have," said the black lamb with something like a sneer. "No doubt
you've noticed the picture of the tiger?"

"Yes, I have," Snowball admitted.

"My uncle joined a circus once," said the black lamb.

"Is that so?" cried Snowball. "Tell me--did he enjoy it?"

"I can't say," the black lamb replied. "He never came back again. They
fed him to the tiger--so I have been told."

And then the black lamb started to run. And suddenly Snowball whisked
about and followed him.

Johnnie Green wondered what had come over Snowball. Was this the pet
that had once followed him all the way to school?

"I'll keep him tied up in the barn for a few days--once I catch him,"
thought Johnnie. If he intended to teach circus tricks to Snowball he
certainly didn't want to spend valuable time chasing him all around the
pasture.

At last Johnnie Green had Snowball cornered. At last he slipped a rope
about Snowball's neck. And then he led his pet towards the bars.

"_Baa-a-a!_" called the black lamb.

It sounded so much like a jeer that Johnnie turned around and made a
face at the black rascal.

In the barnyard Johnnie brought forth a paper-covered hoop. He held it
up in front of Snowball. "Jump!" he cried.

But Snowball drew back.

"_Baa-a-a!_" he bleated. "How do I know that there isn't a tiger behind
that thing?"

"Come!" Johnnie urged him. "Jump! Jump!"

Snowball only moved further away.

And then Johnnie Green lowered the paper-covered hoop and stepped
forward to grasp Snowball by his fleece.

As Johnnie's hand let the hoop fall Snowball gave a frightened blat.
Staring right at him, and grinning horribly, was a tiger pasted upon the
side of the barn.

Snowball turned and ran towards the gate.




XI

CRACKED CORN


The next time Johnnie Green dragged Snowball into the farmyard he shut
the gate carefully behind him.

"We'll never join the circus if you're going to behave like this,"
Johnnie told Snowball severely. "Now, you pay attention!"

He held up a bare hoop--not a paper-covered one--and when he said,
"Jump!" Snowball showed that he had not forgotten his lesson of the
afternoon before.

"That's better!" cried Johnnie Green. "Jump again!" And when Snowball
jumped once more Johnnie was so pleased that he went into the chicken
house and came back with a handful of cracked corn. "Here!" he said to
Snowball. "There's more like it if you behave yourself."

Snowball munched his corn contentedly.

"The black lamb would like this," he thought. "I'll tell him about this
corn the next time I see him. Then maybe he won't be so quick to call me
stupid."

Somehow the cracked corn made Snowball forget all about the frightful
picture of the tiger that grinned from the side of the barn. And at last
Johnnie succeeded in getting Snowball to jump through one of the paper
hoops which he had so carefully made the day before.

"There!" Johnnie cried. "You've done it at last!" And he was so
delighted that he went once more to the chicken house. And this time he
brought back two handfuls of cracked corn.

Unluckily, just as he came out of the chicken house he met his father
going in.

"Here!" Farmer Green exclaimed. "What are you doing with my chicken
feed?"

"I'm giving a little to Snowball," Johnnie told him.

"Ah!" cried Farmer Green with a sly smile. "Fattening your lamb for
market, eh?"

Johnnie's face fell. "No!" he replied. "Of course not! I wouldn't sell
Snowball. He's--he's too valuable."

Farmer Green guffawed.

"He's a circus lamb!" Johnnie cried hotly. "He's learning circus
tricks!"

"Well," said his father, "maybe I have some circus hens in here, for all
I know. Don't you feed my corn to that lamb!"

"Can your hens jump through paper hoops?" Johnnie asked.

"Can your lamb?" demanded Farmer Green.

"Watch!" said Johnnie then. And, holding up another of the paper-covered
hoops, he persuaded Snowball to leap through it neatly.

"Well, I'll be jiggered!" cried Farmer Green--whatever that may mean.

Johnnie Green thought it was a good time to ask a question.

"Mayn't I give him a little corn once in a while?" he begged.

"Oh, I suppose so," said his father. "But if you get him too fat he
won't be much of a jumper."

"But jumping ought to keep him thin," Johnnie insisted.

Just then Snowball gave a plaintive bleat: "_Baa-a-a-a!_"

"There!" Johnnie exclaimed. "He thinks so, too!"




XII

THE ACCIDENT


Snowball was quick to learn one thing. He soon found that jumping
through Johnnie Green's paper-covered hoops brought him plenty of
cracked corn.

No longer did Snowball run away from his young master when Johnnie
entered the pasture and called to him. Nothing that the rascally black
lamb said could persuade Snowball to lead Johnnie Green a chase.

Much to the black lamb's disgust Snowball would start for the bars the
moment Johnnie appeared there. "Johnnie wants to give me a treat!"
Snowball would exclaim. "There's cracked corn waiting for me!" And off
he would go.

Strange as it may seem, Johnnie tired of the circus tricks before
Snowball did. It wasn't long before several days would go by without
Johnnie's once holding up a hoop for Snowball to jump through. And often
Snowball would moon about the farmyard _wishing_ that Johnnie would do
that very thing.

"I hope the cracked corn isn't getting low," said Snowball to himself.
And he cried, "_Ba-a-a-a-a!_" But Johnnie Green paid no heed to him.
Though Johnnie was at that very moment in the swing he never once looked
at Snowball as he roamed mournfully about.

So Snowball crossed the road and strolled up the steep bank opposite the
farmhouse. And having nothing better to do he was about to stroll down
again when he spied something that made him stop short.

Was that a paper-covered hoop that he saw, right there at the top of the
bank? He wondered. It was round. And it was certainly covered with
something that looked like paper.

For a moment Snowball thought he would walk around the hoop--if it was
one--and examine it. He couldn't see anybody holding it up on edge. But
there it was, just waiting for somebody to come along and jump through
it!

"It's a hoop!" Snowball muttered to himself. "There's no doubt about
that." And lowering his head he ran at the hoop--and jumped.

There was a splitting sound and a crash, both at the same time.

Instead of bursting through a thin paper shell and clearing the hoop
neatly Snowball found himself wedged inside something. Though he didn't
know it, he had butted the end of a barrel, knocking in its head and
plunging headlong inside it.

Meanwhile Johnnie Green had stopped swinging. He looked across the road
just in time to see the barrel totter on the edge of the steep bank. Not
only totter; but begin to roll down hill!

Out of the barrel stuck two woolly legs, both kicking frantically.

"What in the world----" Johnnie Green exclaimed. He leaped from the
swing and ran towards the strange sight. But he was too late to help.

The barrel fast gathered headway. It crossed the road like some live
thing, to bring up against the farmhouse with a terrific smash.

Instantly the barrel fell into a dozen pieces as its staves caved in.
And out of the wreck rose Snowball. He gave one frightened bleat. And
then he tore off towards the pasture as fast as he could run. He didn't
even wait to see if Johnnie Green would give him a treat of cracked
corn.

As he ran he said to himself, "There may have been a tiger inside that
thing. . . . I don't know! . . . I wouldn't join the circus for all the
cracked corn in the world!"




XIII

FOLLOW MY LEADER


There was one game of which Farmer Green's sheep never seemed to tire.
They called it "Follow My Leader." And even the oldest members of the
flock played it every day. Though they had grand-children--many of
them--and were quite solemn and sedate, they still continued to run
anywhere whenever somebody happened to lead the way.

You wouldn't suppose they could have enjoyed leaving good pasturage to
go tearing off to goodness knows where, just because some empty-headed
sheep chanced to break into a run.

When Snowball first joined the flock in the pasture he tried to do just
as every one else did. So whenever he saw the flock get under way
suddenly he hastened to keep up with the rest.

At first Snowball was curious to know why they were all running. But
nobody could tell him the reason. And in time he ceased to wonder.

At last he decided, one day, to see if the flock would follow him. He
looked about at his neighbors. They were feeding quietly.

"I hope they'll play the game when I start it," Snowball said under his
breath.

And then, _baaing_ his loudest, he began to run.

The flock stopped eating instantly. For a moment nobody moved.

"They aren't going to play!" thought Snowball.

But an old ewe suddenly wheeled about and followed him.

That was enough for the others. Out of the corner of his eye Snowball
could see them all jump and come crowding after him.

He was headed for the stone wall. Beyond it lay a rough, rocky stretch
of waste land, covered by a tangle of raspberry bushes.

"I wonder if they'll follow me over the wall!" Snowball muttered.

He didn't jump the wall. It was too high for that. But he scrambled over
it without any trouble, for his little feet found plenty of footholds
amid the jutting rocks.

Snowball had already landed on the further side of the wall when _thud!
thud! thud!_ other members of the flock came thumping down upon the
ledge beside him. He moved aside a little way, because he didn't want
to be stepped on.

Then, all at once, a squeaky, frightened voice cried, "What's the
matter? Is there an earthquake?"

Though Snowball looked all about he couldn't see the speaker anywhere.

Meanwhile there sounded a _patter, patter! patter!_ which came from
hurrying feet in the pasture. And there sounded a _click! click! click!_
which came from scrambling feet climbing over the wall. And there
sounded further _thuds_ which came from those same feet as they
thundered down upon the ledge.

At last the slowest sheep had joined Snowball. He still searched for the
squeaky voice.

"This is queer!" Snowball murmured. "I don't see where that odd voice
came from!"

He soon found out. For as he picked his way to the foot of the ledge, to
nibble at the grass that grew down below, he saw peering out of a hole
in the ground the face of a fat old gentleman whom he had sometimes met
in the pasture.

This person's name was Uncle Jerry Chuck. And he looked terribly scared.
His teeth were chattering. His nose was twitching.

Somehow Uncle Jerry's fright seized Snowball, too. With a bleat of
terror he turned and fled up the ledge, scurried over the wall, and ran
back where he had just come from.

Like one sheep the whole flock turned tail and followed Snowball with
frantic _baas_.




XIV

TEASING UNCLE JERRY


Farmer Green's flock of sheep had followed Snowball over the stone wall
and back into the pasture. And soon every one of them was grazing again
as if nothing had happened.

Now, Snowball was greatly pleased. It was the first time he had ever
started that game called Follow My Leader. And there wasn't a sheep nor
a lamb that hadn't gone chasing after him when he showed them the way.

Snowball saw many merry games ahead of him. "I'll give them some good
runs!" he promised himself.

And he did. Before that morning was over he led the flock up to the
furthest corner of the pasture in a mad scramble. And before the
afternoon was over he took them on a brisk run to the bars.

That made three times for the day.

On each summer's day that followed Snowball played Follow My Leader
oftener than he had the day before. So it happened that by the end of a
week, when evening came, the older sheep were weary from all the running
they had done, all the scrambling over the stone wall. For Snowball's
favorite trick was to lead the sheep over the wall and into the tangle
of raspberry bushes where Uncle Jerry Chuck lived.

Snowball had soon learned that there was nothing to fear over there. He
discovered that it was the noise the flock made when leaping down upon
the ledge that alarmed Uncle Jerry Chuck. Drowsing in his underground
chamber Uncle Jerry had thought there must be an earthquake. That was
why his teeth chattered. That was why his nose twitched, when he peeped
out of his doorway.

As soon as Snowball learned all this he took great pains to land upon
the ledge as heavily as he could. He liked to hear Uncle Jerry Chuck's
teeth chatter; he liked to see Uncle Jerry shiver; he liked the sound of
Uncle Jerry's squeaky voice asking what was the matter.

So Snowball enjoyed his days in the pasture--or _in and out_ of it. In
fact he enjoyed them more than anybody else in the flock. For the others
began to grow tired of being led helter-skelter in a headlong flight.
And the old folks especially became annoyed because Snowball took them
so often over the stone wall.

At last the old dame known as "Aunt Nancy," all hung with great folds of
thick fleece, spoke her mind plainly to Snowball himself.

"You're making a nuisance of yourself," she told him. "In all my days I
never knew another youngster--a mere lamb!--to lead the flock. And here
you're making us run our legs off every day! When I was your age we
children never started a game of Follow My Leader. We _followed_ behind
the rest of the flock. We never _led_."

All this was a great surprise for Snowball. "D-don't you like the game?"
he stammered.

"The game's all right," the old lady said. "But nobody cares to play it
a dozen times a day. And nobody enjoys having to clamber over the stone
wall again and again."

Snowball said nothing for a few minutes. He was thinking.

"When I run, why do you follow me if you don't wish to?" he inquired at
last.

"I don't know," the old lady confessed. "Maybe I fell into the habit of
following when I was young. Anyhow, I can't help myself now. I just have
to go along with the others."

Poor lady!




XV

UNCLE JERRY OBJECTS


Snowball really _meant_ to be kind to the elderly dame, Aunt Nancy, who
had objected to being led on the wild goose chases in which he
delighted.

"I mustn't start another game of Follow My Leader," he said to himself.
"Aunt Nancy says she can't help following. And for a person of her years
it must be hard work to run."

But Snowball soon learned that he had set himself a hard task. Soon
afterward he found himself suddenly running. He hadn't _meant_ to run.
Yet there he was, bounding along towards the stone wall as fast as he
could jump! And the whole flock was following him, with Aunt Nancy
puffing hard among the stragglers, doing her best to keep up.

Over the wall went Snowball. Over the wall went all the rest. Aunt Nancy
was the last to leap down upon the ledge where Snowball had stopped. And
he could see that she was upset. He edged away from her. But she
shouldered her friends aside (she was a huge person!) and walked
straight up to him.

"You're a spoiled child," she told Snowball. "Here you've gone and led
us over this wall again! And I just told you I didn't want to run
anywhere--over this wall least of all places!"

Snowball felt much ashamed.

"I--I didn't mean to do it," he faltered. "Something set my feet
a-going. I _had_ to go along with them!"

"Is that so?" she cried in dismay. "My goodness! You've been and gone
and got the habit of being leader! And you can't stop! . . . I don't know
what I'm going to do!" she wailed. "There'll be nothing left of me if
this keeps up. I'll be nothing but fleece and bones if I have to run so
much."

Somehow her friends didn't seem alarmed. Aunt Nancy was very fat. In
fact she was so very, very fat that nobody thought she _could_ waste
away. And everybody smiled a little.

But she didn't notice that. And then a squeaky voice piped up:

"Is there an earthquake?"

It was Uncle Jerry Chuck peeping out of his hole, with his teeth
chattering so fast that it seemed as if they must all drop out of his
mouth.

"There's no earthquake," Aunt Nancy told him. "We just jumped off the
wall upon this ledge--that's all."

"I was sure there was an earthquake," he said. "And the last quake was
the worst of all."

There were more smiles then, for Aunt Nancy herself had been the last of
the flock to plump down off the wall.

"I wish--" said Uncle Jerry Chuck--"I wish, when you folks jump the
wall, you'd pick out a different place. You disturb me a dozen times a
day. I'm losing lots of sleep on your account. And if I continue to lose
my rest I'll be nothing but fur and bones."

Well, Uncle Jerry was fat, too. He looked as if it would do him a world
of good to be thinner. But Aunt Nancy felt sorry for him.

"Whoever leads the way over the wall must pick out another spot," she
declared, looking straight at Snowball as she spoke. "It's a shame to
annoy this gentleman."

Everybody agreed with her good-naturedly. And Snowball said meekly that
if he found himself running towards the wall he would try to turn his
steps in another direction.

No one said anything more about the matter. For somebody suddenly cried,
"_Baa! baa!_" and scrambled over the wall.

Of course the whole flock followed instantly, leaving Uncle Jerry Chuck
to creep out of his hole and watch the last tail of all bob out of
sight.

It was Aunt Nancy's.

"They're a queer lot," Uncle Jerry said aloud. He gave a long whistle.
"I'm glad I'm not one of 'em," he added.




XVI

AUNT NANCY'S PLAN


All was quiet once more, after the race from the ledge near Uncle Jerry
Chuck's home. The flock was feeding again. And if you hadn't noticed how
Aunt Nancy Ewe puffed from her fast running you wouldn't have supposed
there had just been a wild scramble over the stone wall and back.

Aunt Nancy was still feeling sorry for Uncle Jerry Chuck, whose rest had
been disturbed by the thud of hoofs above his head. "Remember!" she said
to Snowball sternly. "Don't go near Uncle Jerry's home again!"

"I won't!" he promised. "That is," he added, "I won't if I can help it.
If I find myself running that way I may not be able to stop myself."

Now, that sort of promise wasn't enough for Aunt Nancy.

"You must turn aside!" she told Snowball. "Just make believe that
there's a bear beyond the stone wall, instead of Uncle Jerry Chuck!
_Then_--" she said--"_then_ you'll turn quickly enough!"

"That's a good idea!" cried Snowball. "If only I don't forget it!"

Aunt Nancy's words never left his mind all the rest of the morning. Just
thinking about bears made Snowball frightfully uneasy. Whenever one of
the flock happened to stray up behind him Snowball jumped, fearing for a
moment that it was a bear.

If anybody said _baa_ in his ear he leaped to one side, expecting the
_baa_ to turn into a _woof!_

He began to wish that Aunt Nancy hadn't told him of her idea.

And all at once, when somebody came up behind him and gave him a nudge,
Snowball started to run.

"There's a bear behind me!" he thought.

Of course the rest of the flock thought he was only playing Follow My
Leader. So they followed him, every one of them.

Snowball went bounding across the pasture towards the stone wall, headed
straight for the spot where Uncle Jerry Chuck had his home. When he was
only a few jumps away from the wall he glanced back. He saw then that
there was no bear behind him. But he did notice Aunt Nancy Ewe, doing
her best to keep up with the rest. And then Snowball remembered what
she had said to him. If a bear--instead of Uncle Jerry Chuck--lived in
the hole at the foot of the ledge!

Well, that thought was enough to make Snowball swerve sharply to his
right. And a few moments later he bobbed over the wall a little further
up the hillside.

Just beyond the wall grew a tangle of berry bushes. And into the midst
of them Snowball jumped. And out of the midst of them, right in front of
him, there rose up on his hind legs--a bear!

Snowball gave a frightened, frantic blat. The next instant he was
scrambling back over the wall.

The foremost of the oncoming flock of sheep saw him. They couldn't think
what had happened. Anyhow, they couldn't stop. Close behind them pressed
the flock, all bunched together and hurrying blindly on.




XVII

A TERRIBLE MIX-UP


There was a terrible mix-up. Some sheep were trying to cross the stone
wall in one direction. Some were trying to cross it in the other. And in
the midst of the fleecy tangle Snowball struggled in vain. He found
himself face to face with Aunt Nancy Ewe, who was so huge that he
couldn't budge her. He pushed and shoved until she cried out, "Where are
your manners, young man?"

"I--I don't know," Snowball stammered. "Maybe I left them in the berry
bushes, with the bear."

[Illustration: Snowball Gave A Frantic Blat.

_The Tale of Snowball Lamb._ _Page 87_]

Well, the moment she heard the word _bear_ Aunt Nancy blatted at the
top of her lungs. With a mighty heave she turned about on the top of the
wall, sweeping Snowball off it as if he were nothing but a fly.

He fell backwards among the raspberry bushes, fully expecting to be
eaten by the bear. He shut his eyes and held his breath, and lay with
his feet in the air, waiting for the bear to seize him.

"Oh, dear!" he groaned. "I wonder if he'll begin with my head or my
tail!"

Just then he felt a terrible nip at the end of his tail.

"He's begun! The bear has begun to eat me!" Snowball thought.

As for the bear, he didn't say a single word. And that seemed odd.
Somehow Snowball didn't quite like it because the bear didn't exclaim
how nice and tender he was. His tail was still held fast. And that was
as much as Snowball knew.

At last he slowly opened his eyes. To his astonishment he saw no bear.
In fact he saw nobody at all. For the last of Farmer Green's flock of
sheep had vanished. And Snowball noticed, resting on the tip of his
tail, a stone. Though he did not know it, the last sheep to leave had
kicked it down upon him purely by accident.

Snowball gave a _baa_ of surprise and relief. With a little effort he
managed to jerk his tail from under the stone. Then he sprang to his
feet. And since there was no knowing where the bear was, Snowball made
all haste to get on the other side of the stone wall and join the flock
of sheep once more.

When Aunt Nancy saw him she did not act half as pleased as he had
expected she would.

"You got us into a pickle, young man!" she greeted him.

"It seems to me," he replied, "that you are the one that made all the
trouble. If you hadn't made me jump the wall----"

"If _I_ hadn't made _you_----" Aunt Nancy interrupted. And turning to
her companions she cried, "Did you ever hear anything like that in all
your days?"

And everybody said, "No!"

And then somebody asked, "Where's the bear?"

But nobody could answer that question.

The only one that could have answered it was Cuffy Bear himself. And he
was way up under the mountain--and still running.

There wasn't a sheep in the flock that had been more frightened than
he.




XVIII

THE SWING


As Snowball grew older he began to enjoy a fine, new sport. At least
this sport was new to him. All the old rams had enjoyed it for years.
But it was not until Snowball's horns began to grow that he became
interested in having fun in this way.

The new sport was _butting_. Snowball was careful not to butt any sheep
that were much bigger than he was. For instance, he never even
threatened to butt the black lamb, who was some months the older of the
two. And Snowball didn't butt Johnnie Green; for Snowball was fond of
him.

Snowball didn't feel the same toward other boys. Other boys liked to
tease him. A neighbor's boy called "Red" was the biggest tease of them
all. He never missed a chance to bother Snowball--unless Johnnie Green
objected.

So it was only to be expected that Snowball should want to butt Red.
More than once he had stolen up behind Red and butted him as hard as he
could butt.

At first Red only laughed. But as Snowball grew bigger--and heavier--Red
no longer found anything to laugh at in Snowball's favorite sport.
Instead of laughing, Red was more likely to go to rubbing himself where
Snowball had struck him.

"You'll have to get rid of this pet of yours!" Red said to Johnnie
Green. "That is, you'll have to if you expect me to come to your place
any longer."

"I won't get rid of Snowball," Johnnie Green declared. "It serves you
right if he butts you. You've teased him too often. I don't blame
Snowball at all."

"Send him away, now; or I'll go home," Red threatened.

At that Johnnie Green drove Snowball behind the barn. But he wouldn't
stay there. He came trotting back to the farmyard in no time.

"Leave him alone! Don't pay any attention to him and he won't touch
you!" Johnnie advised Red.

However, that young man was uneasy. But he said nothing more about the
matter. And turning to the swing under the big old apple tree he cried,
"Come on, Johnnie! I'll swing you."

Now, Johnnie Green had swung in that swing thousands of times. But it
wasn't often anybody was willing to stand and push him until he went
up, up, up, high among the leafy branches.

"All right!" he said. "None of your tricks, now!"

Red only grinned. And he began pushing Johnnie. He pushed so hard that
for once Johnnie was satisfied. Once he thought the swing seat--with him
on it--was going to turn completely over.

The whole thing was most strange. It was most unusual. Red was always
ready to be swung. Never had he been willing, before, to swing anybody
else. So Johnnie decided to enjoy the fun while he could. Back and forth
he rode in long sweeps.

Meanwhile Snowball kept edging nearer. He was behind Red. And all the
time Red kept a careful eye on him. But of this Johnnie Green saw
nothing. For of course his back was turned to Red and to Snowball, too.

There was no doubt that Snowball wanted to take a hand in the sport--or
perhaps it would be better to say _take a horn_. Anyhow he lowered his
head now and then, and shook it. And at last he stamped upon the ground.

"Hang tight, Johnnie!" Red cried. "Here comes the biggest push of all!"
And he gave Johnnie a mighty shove.

Then Red waved his tattered hat almost in Snowball's face.

That was a deadly insult. At least so Snowball thought. He gathered his
legs beneath him. He shot forward.

Already Johnnie Green had begun his long backward swing.

For a moment you would have thought Red was going to get caught in a
tight place. Johnnie Green was almost upon him. Snowball was almost upon
him.

And then Red jumped.




XIX

THE WRONG TARGET


"Give me another push like that one!" Johnnie Green shouted from the
swing.

Little did he dream that Snowball was rushing towards him from behind,
rushing with head lowered in his best butting style.

Of course when the boy Red slipped out of the way there was only one
thing that could happen. A moment after Johnnie shouted, Snowball struck
the swing seat.

Crash! Bang! Split! A terrible cry from Johnnie Green! And a second or
two later a dull thud!

The crash, bang and split came when Snowball's head met the swing seat.
The thud followed when Johnnie hit the ground.

Then all was quiet, except for a low moaning from the spot where Johnnie
Green lay.

Red had climbed spryly into a wagon which stood near-by. But he soon saw
that he needn't have gone to that trouble. For Snowball plainly had no
more butts left in him for the time being. He stood still in a dazed
fashion and stared dully about him. The heavy oaken swing seat had been
no soft mark to hit, sailing swiftly through the air with eighty pounds
of boy upon it.

Red had given one great shout. But now he too was very quiet. He jumped
out of the wagon and ran to Johnnie Green, and lifted Johnnie's head.

"Are you hurt, Johnnie?" he asked.

But it was almost a minute before Johnnie Green could speak. It was
almost as long as that before he could even breathe. He lay there
gasping, with his hands clutched across his stomach. His eyes rolled
about in the queerest way. If Red hadn't been frightened he would have
laughed in Johnnie's face.

At last Johnnie Green spoke.

"Wh-wh-what happened?" he asked in a halting whisper. "Did the ropes
break?"

"No!" Red answered. "The ropes held--though it's a wonder."

"Can't you tell me what happened?" Johnnie begged him. "If it wasn't the
ropes, what was it?"

"It was Snowball," said Red. "He butted you."

"I don't believe it," cried Johnnie. "He never butted me in his whole
life."

Johnnie Green was sitting up now. And since he didn't seem to be much
hurt the boy Red couldn't help grinning.

"Look at that swing seat!" he exclaimed, pointing to the splintered bit
of oak board near Johnnie. "You don't think--do you?--that I split that
thing with _my_ head?"

And then Johnnie Green just had to believe him. And Johnnie began to get
angry, too.

"You must have seen Snowball coming," he growled. "Why didn't you warn
me?"

Red swallowed a few times as he tried to think of a good answer.

"Well," he replied finally, "I didn't _know_ he was going to butt you,
did I? Didn't you just say yourself that he never _had_ butted you?"

To all this Johnnie Green made no answer.

"If you ask me," Red went on more easily, "I should say you were lucky.
You were lucky to have that swing seat under you."

Johnnie Green rose slowly to his feet.

"There's something queer about this," he declared.

"That's so," Red agreed. "There is. You'd just asked for another hard
push. . . . And you got one--a harder one than I could have given
you. . . . So I don't see what you're complaining about."

And then he pretended that he didn't understand why Johnnie Green tried
to hit him.




XX

THE SWIMMING HOLE


After the affair at the swing it was as much as a week before Johnnie
Green saw anything of his neighbor Red.

It was almost a week before Snowball felt like butting anybody. Even
when other sheep bullied him Snowball edged away from them; and once he
would have run into them head first.

Somehow he couldn't forget that frightful jolt he had received when he
knocked Johnnie Green out of the swing.

At last, however, he tried a gentle butt one day against the soft side
of one of his mates. And finding only pleasure, and no pain, in the
trick he became once more one of the most active butters in Farmer
Green's whole flock.

Now, Johnnie Green had noticed that for a few days Snowball was
unusually well behaved. And Snowball's gentleness did not please him.
For Johnnie had hoped that sometime Snowball would butt the neighbor's
boy Red.

So Johnnie Green began to whistle a merry tune a little later, when he
chanced to see Snowball charging the hired man as he crossed the
pasture.

Not long after that Johnnie Green went swimming. He found other boys at
the swimming hole, which they had made by damming Broad Brook where it
cut across the end of the meadow. Among the swimmers was the boy Red. It
was the first time Johnnie had seen him since that day when Snowball
butted Johnnie.

When Johnnie spied Red in the water he thought for a moment or two that
he would find Red's clothes on the bank and tie knots in them. That was
a favorite trick of Red's--tying hard knots in other boys' clothes.
Sometimes he even wet the knots, to make them harder to untie.

But Johnnie Green decided that he wouldn't knot Red's clothes. Besides,
Red seemed to be keeping a watchful eye on them.

Johnnie slipped out of his own clothes quickly and soon he had dived off
a flat rock and joined the boys in the swimming hole.

Red had called "Hullo!" pleasantly enough. And then Johnnie was sure he
said something in an undertone to the others. Anyhow they all grinned.
And one boy cried, "I didn't expect to see you down here. I thought
you'd be swinging. Wouldn't you rather swing than swim?"

Johnnie Green gave a sickly smile.

"Why didn't you bring your lamb with you?" another inquired. "Doesn't he
follow you any more?"

But Johnnie Green had ducked down where he couldn't hear and was
swimming under water. When he came up everybody yelled at him. That is,
everybody yelled except Red. _He_ looked very innocent, as if he didn't
know what the joke was.

Well, Johnnie Green had a good swim, anyhow. And the boys soon stopped
teasing him. They had several swimming races, with a good deal of
splashing mixed in. And there was so much fun that nobody noticed when
Red crawled out upon the bank and slipped away behind the drooping
willows that overhung the stream.

The boys saw him plainly enough a little while afterward. Fully dressed
he stood on the bank and jeered at them. And they knew what that meant.
It meant that he had tied plenty of knots in everybody's clothes.

All the boys except Johnnie Green yelled at him.

"We'll fix you when we catch you!" they cried.

As for Johnnie, he said never a word. In fact he didn't even look angry.
On the contrary, he smiled. For he saw something that his friends had
overlooked.

Some distance behind Red Johnnie saw the willows part. And a white face
peered out.

It was Snowball's.




XXI

A DUCKING


As he stood there on the great flat rock over the swimming hole Red
never guessed that Snowball was behind him. But the swimmers soon
noticed Snowball. And they all began to call to Red. They didn't care
what they said, so long as they could keep Red so busy answering them
that he wouldn't turn around and discover Snowball. They splashed about,
and hooted, and on the whole made such an uproar that Red couldn't have
heard the Muley Cow had she walked up behind him.

Now, there was nothing that Red enjoyed any more than a wordy battle.
Whenever a boy called him a name Red hurled a worse one back at him. It
seemed as if he actually took pride in making blood curdling retorts.
Certainly he didn't mean to leave, so long as anybody gave him an excuse
for a jibe.

Meanwhile Snowball had spied Red. And to Snowball he was a tempting
sight. As Snowball drew nearer Red leaned forward with his hands upon
his knees and taunted Johnnie Green: "You'd better keep that ole
ram-lamb of yours out of my way! If he ever comes near me I'll----"

Nobody ever found out what it was that Red meant to do. His threat stuck
fast in his throat. For before he could utter it Snowball lowered his
head and dashed at him. He gave Red a butt that lifted him off the rock
and sent him sailing through the air with arms and legs waving wildly,
to fall with a great splash into the swimming hole, where the water was
deepest.

There was a howl of delight. But it did not come from Red. He was
somewhere between the surface of the water and the mucky bottom.

Presently he appeared, spluttering and blowing and gasping. For once in
his life Red had nothing to say in answer to the jibes and jeers of his
mates.

His hat was floating near him. Johnnie Green snatched it up, scooped it
full of water and clapped it upon Red's head.

Even then Red didn't say a word.

But when Snowball looked blandly down at the boys from the great flat
rock and said, "_Baa-a-a!_"--then Red spoke.

He spoke his mind very freely and at some length. And he dared Johnnie
to come out upon the bank with him.

Johnnie Green promptly swam towards the bank where Snowball stood.

"Not that side!" cried Red. "The other one!"

But Johnnie remarked mildly that he supposed of course Red meant the
side towards home. "You've got all your clothes on," said Johnnie. "You
wouldn't want to have to cross the brook, later, and get them wet."

Now, since Red's clothes were as wet as clothes could be, that seemed a
very stupid remark. And Red told Johnnie Green--well, he told him a
number of things. And then Red scrambled up the opposite bank from the
one where Snowball stood, and started off, leaving a trail of water
behind him.

Johnnie Green and his friends forsook the swimming hole and took their
clothes out upon the flat rock, which was warm in the sunshine. And
there they spent a pleasant time untying the knots that Red had made in
them. But first the boys made Johnnie Green drive Snowball away.

"Red will catch it when he gets home," said one of them. "His father
told him not to go swimming to-day."

And not one of them said he was sorry.




XXII

A GREAT JOKE


Farmer Green played a great joke on his flock of sheep. At least that
was what Snowball thought. Since he was not really one of Farmer Green's
flock, but belonged to Johnnie Green, he escaped this joke himself. And
that was the reason why he was able to laugh so heartily at all his
companions.

[Illustration: Snowball and the Black Ram Met Head to Head.

_The Tale of Snowball Lamb._ _Page 115_]

The joke was this: Farmer Green and the hired man sheared the sheep.
Close clipped as they were, the flock looked very odd. When Snowball
caught his first glimpse of the young black ram, after Farmer Green had
sheared him and turned him back into the pasture, minus his fleece,
Snowball did not know him. Just for a moment Snowball thought the young
black ram was a new kind of dog.

"Old dog Spot won't care for this stranger," Snowball thought. He was
about to warn the stranger to leave the farm at once, when he saw that
he wasn't a dog after all. For Snowball noticed that he ate grass.

"He's a queer creature. And whatever he may be, Spot's sure to dislike
him. So I'll advise him to run along, anyhow," Snowball decided.

So Snowball called out, "There's an old dog on this farm that will chase
you if he catches you here. You'd better go away before he finds you."

To Snowball's amazement the stranger looked at him boldly and said,
"_Baa-a-a!_" Then, in a flash, Snowball knew that it was the voice of
the young black ram, and no other.

"What's happened to you?" Snowball cried, as soon as he could speak.

"Haven't you heard the news?" the black ram asked him. "Didn't you know
that Farmer Green and the hired man had begun to shear us?"

"No!" Snowball exclaimed.

"Well, they have," said the black ram. "And Farmer Green paid me the
honor of shearing me himself, the first of all."

"The honor!" Snowball repeated. "I don't see why you think it's an
_honor_. Why, you're the queerest looking animal on the farm." And he
began to laugh at the black ram, and blat at him.

Now, the black ram was a peppery chap. He promptly lost his temper and
stamped his feet and shook his head at Snowball.

"I'll butt you for that!" he bawled.

Once Snowball would have retreated. The black ram had always been both
older and bigger than he. But now, though the black ram was still older,
he looked smaller. That, of course, was because he had lost his thick
fleece. He looked so much smaller that Snowball was no longer afraid of
him.

For the first time since he had come to the farm to live Snowball
lowered his head at the black ram. And he didn't even wait for the black
ram to make the first move. Instead, Snowball charged him.

A moment later they met, head to head, with a shock that knocked
Snowball off his feet.

"My goodness!" Snowball exclaimed as he picked himself up. "You're
bigger than you look."

"Do you want any more?" the black ram demanded fiercely. "I've done you
the honor to knock you down. Is once enough?"

Snowball thought once was even too much. He left the black ram hurriedly
and ran down toward the bars.

Some very odd looking creatures were entering the pasture.




XXIII

A MYSTERY


As Snowball drew near the pasture bars he forgot about the blow on the
head that the black ram had given him. The strange sights that greeted
his eyes drove all unpleasant things out of his mind.

Snowball knew that the sheep he saw before him must be his old
companions. But they were so changed, by shearing, that he couldn't tell
who was who.

He stood still and stared at them and grinned.

"What amuses you, young man?" one of them asked him in a tart voice. The
speaker was a big old dame. Even with her fleece closely cropped she
looked undeniably fat. Yet she was wrinkled, too. And her neck had a
scrawny look.

Not until she spoke did Snowball guess that this person was Aunt Nancy
Ewe. The moment he heard her voice he knew her. And he couldn't help
laughing right in her face.

"Don't be rude, young man!" Aunt Nancy scolded. "Anybody would think you
had never seen a sheared flock before."

"I haven't," Snowball answered. "You're all so funny that I can't keep
my face straight."

"Well," she said, "you'll have a chance to laugh at yourself a little
later. For you'll certainly be sheared too."

Snowball turned sober instantly.

"Oh! Do you think so?" he cried.

"They'll never let you keep that fleece on all summer," Aunt Nancy
declared.

She had scarcely finished speaking when Farmer Green came into the
pasture. And Snowball was sure that Farmer Green looked directly at him.
But before Snowball could make up his mind to run, Johnnie Green came
hurrying after his father, and shouting.

"Don't touch Snowball!" he called. "Don't you shear him!"

"Why not?" his father asked him.

"Because," said Johnnie, "I want to shear him myself. He belongs to me."

"Very well!" his father replied. "Now we're here we may as well catch
him. And you can begin shearing him. It will probably take you all day,
because you've never sheared a sheep before."

"I don't want to shear him now," said Johnnie. "I'm going fishing
to-day. I'll do it to-morrow."

Then Farmer Green and Johnnie went away. And they hadn't passed the
bars when a great uproar broke out. The whole flock crowded around
Snowball. And everybody except him said, "_Baa!_"

"He laughs best who laughs last," Aunt Nancy remarked to him. "To-morrow
we'll laugh best--at you!"

But Snowball stood his ground and shook his head.

"I'm not going to be sheared," he declared. "I guess you don't know what
Johnnie Green's 'to-morrow' means. . . . It means 'never!'"

Snowball really thought he was right about that.

The next morning he found that he had been mistaken. For Johnnie Green
came and cornered--and caught--him. And amid a chorus of _baas_ Johnnie
led Snowball to the barn.

"Let's wait at the bars until Johnnie brings Snowball back!" cried the
young black ram, who bad knocked Snowball down the day before. "We want
to give him a good welcome when he comes back without his fleece."

"It's useless to wait," said Aunt Nancy. "You know Farmer Green said it
would take Johnnie all day to shear him."

Along toward noon the black ram came hurrying to the upper end of the
pasture, where most of the sheep were feeding.

"Snowball's here!" he blatted. "And he's sheared, too!"

And just then Aunt Nancy Ewe came puffing and panting to join the
others.

"Snowball's back in the pasture!" she gasped. "And he isn't sheared at
all!"

Well, nobody knew what to think of that.




XXIV

HALF AND HALF


All the sheep in the pasture hurried down the hillside toward the bars
to look at Snowball. And soon dozens of disputes might have been heard:
"He is!" "He isn't!" "He's sheared!" "He's not!" About half the flock
were sure Johnnie Green had sheared Snowball; while the other half were
just as sure that Snowball still wore his fleece.

At last Aunt Nancy Ewe went close to Snowball and walked all the way
around him. And when she joined her friends she announced that she had
solved the mystery.

"Snowball is sheared on one side only!" she exclaimed.

It was true. And the moment the flock learned what had happened they set
up a deafening _baaing_. "_Baa-ha-ha-ha-ha!_" they laughed. "Now who's a
sight?" they asked Snowball. "Now who looks funny?"

Poor Snowball couldn't say a word. He hung his head. For he was terribly
ashamed of his appearance.

"It's not my fault," he wailed at last. "When Johnnie Green had me half
sheared that horrid boy Red came along and asked Johnnie to go fishing.
And you know Johnnie Green! He can't miss a fishing trip. . . . He said
he'd finish shearing me to-morrow."

"Ha!" cried Aunt Nancy Ewe. And she flung at Snowball the very words he
had used the day before. "Johnnie Green's 'to-morrow' means 'never!'"

"Oh! I hope not!" cried Snowball. "That would be awful!"

Somehow Snowball managed to get through that first dreadful day. But the
following day he gave up all hope; for Johnnie Green never came near
him. Nor did he come the next day, nor the next, nor the next.

Little by little the sheep stopped teasing Snowball. Little by little he
became used to having one side of him sheared and the other side thick
with fleece.

For some time he tried to keep as much out of sight as possible, grazing
along the stone wall where he could bury himself in the bushes whenever
one of the flock strayed near him. Or if he couldn't hide, he took pains
to stand so that only one side of him should show.

It was a long while before his neighbors stopped smiling when they saw
him. But finally there were only two in the flock that couldn't seem to
forget how ridiculous Snowball looked. These were the young black ram
and old Aunt Nancy Ewe. And perhaps they can't be blamed, because
Snowball had once openly made fun of them. When they were near him
Snowball was very uncomfortable. But with the rest of the flock he felt
more at his ease. And sometimes he even went so far as to say that he
_enjoyed_ being half sheared.

"On a cool day I find it pleasant to turn my clipped side toward the
sun," he would remark. "And if there's a chilly wind I don't have to
shiver. I let it blow against my fleecy side; and I never feel it."

In two weeks Snowball was claiming that he _preferred_ to be only half
sheared.

Maybe that was true. Maybe he was only trying to make himself think it
was. Anyhow, when Johnnie Green came into the pasture one day and called
to him Snowball bounded down the grassy slope toward the bars.

And when he came back to the pasture, some time later, he didn't look
very different from his companions. One side of him, however, showed a
pinkish tinge, because Johnnie Green had just sheared that side very
close. And the fleece on his other side had already begun to grow out a
bit.

But Snowball didn't mind that. He had a pink nose, always. And he said
that pink was his favorite color.

And never again did he laugh at anybody, no matter how queer a person
might look.


THE END




SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

(Trademark Registered.)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

        AUTHOR OF THE
        SLEEPY-TIME TALES and TUCK-ME-IN TALES

        =Colored Wrapper and Text Illustrations Drawn by HARRY L. SMITH=

These are fascinating stories of farmyard folk for boys and girls from
about four to eight years of age.


THE TALE OF MISS KITTY CAT

When Mrs. Rat saw Miss Kitty Cat washing her face, she knew it meant
rain. And she wouldn't let her husband leave home without his umbrella.


THE TALE OF HENRIETTA HEN

Henrietta Hen was an empty-headed creature with strange notions. She
never laid an egg without making a great fuss about it.


THE TALE OF THE MULEY COW

The Muley Cow belonged to Johnnie Green. He often milked her; and she
seldom put her foot in the milk pail.


THE TALE OF TURKEY PROUDFOOT

A vain fellow was Turkey Proudfoot. He loved to strut about the farmyard
and spread his tail, which he claimed was the most elegant one in the
neighborhood.


THE TALE OF PONY TWINKLEHEELS

Pony Twinkleheels trotted so fast you could scarcely tell one foot from
another. Everybody had to step lively to get out of his way.


THE TALE OF OLD DOG SPOT

Old dog Spot had a keen nose. He was always ready to chase the wild
folk. And he always looked foolish when they got away from him.


THE TALE OF GRUNTY PIG

Grunty pig was a great trial to his mother. He found it hard not to put
his feet right in the feeding trough at meal time.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK




TUCK-ME-IN TALES

(Trademark Registered)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

        AUTHOR OF THE
        SLEEPY-TIME TALES and SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

        =Colored Wrapper and Text Illustrations Drawn by HARRY L. SMITH=

A delightful and unusual series of bird and insect stories for boys and
girls from three to eight years old, or thereabouts.


THE TALE OF JOLLY ROBIN

Jolly Robin spreads happiness everywhere with his merry song.


THE TALE OF OLD MR. CROW

A wise bird was Mr. Crow. He'd laugh when any one tried to catch him.


THE TALE OF SOLOMON OWL

Solomon Owl looked so solemn that many people thought he knew
everything.


THE TALE OF JASPER JAY

Jasper Jay was very mischievous. But many of his neighbors liked him.


THE TALE OF RUSTY WREN

Rusty Wren fought bravely to keep all strangers out of his house.


THE TALE OF DADDY LONG-LEGS

Daddy Long-Legs could point in all directions at once--with his
different legs.


THE TALE OF KIDDIE KATYDID

He was a musical person and chanted all night during the autumn.


THE TALE OF BETSY BUTTERFLY

Betsy spent most of her time among the flowers.


THE TALE OF BUSTER BUMBLEBEE

Buster was clumsy and blundering, but was known far and wide.


THE TALE OF FREDDIE FIREFLY

Freddie had great sport dancing in the meadow and flashing his light.


THE TALE OF BOBBY BOBOLINK

Bobby had a wonderful voice and loved to sing.


THE TALE OF CHIRPY CRICKET

Chirpy loved to stroll about after dark and "chirp."


THE TALE OF MRS. LADYBUG

Mrs. Ladybug loved to find out what her neighbors were doing and to give
them advice.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK

       *       *       *       *       *

Transcriber's Notes:

Obvious punctuation errors repaired.

Final page, "Crirpy" changed to "Chirpy" (Chirpy loved to stroll)






End of Project Gutenberg's The Tale of Snowball Lamb, by Arthur Bailey

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TALE OF SNOWBALL LAMB ***

***** This file should be named 24592.txt or 24592.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/4/5/9/24592/

Produced by Joe Longo, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
